New York, session 2025-2026, A5276.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 211 of the judiciary law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (m) to read as follows: 3 (m) The establishment of childcare centers in all courts in the 4 unified court system. Such childcare centers shall provide free child- 5 care for the minor children and dependents of: 6 (i) jurors during any period in which the jury has been sequestered by 7 the court; 8 (ii) any party to a civil case; and 9 (iii) any criminal defendant. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 11 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 12 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 13 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 14 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09144-01-5